Colorado, session 2026A, HB1387.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33-111, amend
(2)(a)(I)(A) as follows:
24-33-111. Conservation of native species - fund created - repeal.
(2) Species conservation trust fund - creation.
(a) (I) (A) There is created in the state treasury the species
conservation trust fund, which is subject to annual authorization by the
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

general assembly to carry out the purposes of this section. The fund consists
of all money transferred by the treasurer as specified in subsection
(2)(a)(I)(B) of this section AND SECTION 39-29-109 (2)(a)(II.5)(E) and all
money appropriated to the fund pursuant to section 39-29-109.3 (1)(g)(I).
At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended money in the fund remains in
the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any
other fund. To the maximum extent practical, only interest from the fund
shall be expended for activities pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-29-109, amend
(2)(a)(II.5)(B) and (2)(a)(II.5)(C); and add (2)(a)(II.5)(E) as follows:
39-29-109. Severance tax trust fund - created - administration
- distribution of money - legislative declaration - repeal.
(2) State severance tax receipts must be credited to the severance tax
trust fund as provided in section 39-29-108. All income derived from the
deposit and investment of the money in the fund must be credited to the
fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered
money in the fund remains in the fund and must not be credited or
transferred to the general fund or any other fund. All money in the fund is
subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the following purposes:
(a) The severance tax perpetual base fund.
(II.5) The board shall use the money in the fund:
(B) To direct the state treasurer to transfer amounts to the water
supply reserve fund created in subsection (2)(c) of this section; and
(C) To direct the state treasurer to transfer amounts to the interbasin
compact committee operation fund created in section 37-75-107; AND
(E) TO DIRECT THE STATE TREASURER TO ANNUALLY TRANSFER NO
MORE THAN THREE MILLION DOLLARS TO THE SPECIES CONSERVATION TRUST
FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-33-111 (2)(a)(I).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-29-109.3, amend
(1) introductory portion; and add (13) as follows:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1387

39-29-109.3. Severance tax operational fund - core reserve -
grant program reserve - definitions - repeal.
(1) The executive director of the department of natural resources
shall submit with the department's budget request for each fiscal year a list
and description of the programs the executive director recommends to be
funded from the severance tax operational fund created in section
39-29-109 (2)(b), referred to in this section as the "operational fund".
Except as otherwise provided in subsections (10), and (11), (12), AND (13)
of this section, the general assembly may appropriate money from the total
money available in the operational fund to fund recommended programs as
follows:
(13) (a) BEGINNING IN APRIL 2027, AND EVERY APRIL THEREAFTER,
THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
SHALL DETERMINE AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE DIFFERENCE OF:
(I) THE AMOUNT PROJECTED BY THE MARCH REVENUE FORECAST
RELIED ON BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN SETTING THE STATE BUDGET FOR
THE NEXT STATE FISCAL YEAR AS THE AMOUNT OF TOTAL STATE SEVERANCE
TAX RECEIPTS THAT THE STATE TREASURER WILL TRANSFER TO THE
OPERATIONAL FUND FOR THE CURRENT STATE FISCAL YEAR; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FOR
THE PROGRAMS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) THROUGH (1)(g) OF THIS
SECTION IN THE CURRENT YEAR.
(b) BEGINNING IN APRIL 2027, AND EVERY APRIL THEREAFTER,
AFTER MAKING THE DETERMINATION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (13)(a) OF
THIS SECTION, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES SHALL REPORT AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE GREATER OF ZERO OR
THE AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (13)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) ON JUNE 30, 2027, AND EACH JUNE 30 THEREAFTER, THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER FROM THE OPERATIONAL FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF FOURTEEN MILLION
TWO HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS OR THE AMOUNT REPORTED TO THE
STATE TREASURER PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (13)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1387

SECTION 4. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the cash funds
appropriations from the severance tax operational fund created in section
39-29-109 (2)(b)(I), Colorado Revised Statutes, made in the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of
natural resources for use by the executive director's office for the species
conservation trust fund is decreased by $3,000,000.
(2) (a) If the cash fund appropriation from the severance tax
operational fund created in section 39-29-109 (2)(b)(I), Colorado Revised
Statutes, made in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year to the department of natural resources for use by executive
director's office for the species conservation trust fund is an amount less
than the amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1) of this section,
the cash fund appropriation is decreased to $0.
(b) If the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year does not include an appropriation to the department of natural
resources for use by the executive director's office for the species
conservation trust fund, then subsection (1) does not require a reduction of
an appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27
state fiscal year.
SECTION 5. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 4 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 4 of this act takes effect upon the effective date of this act or
of the annual general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27,
whichever is later.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1387

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1387